Illinois, session 104th, HB2817.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Database Resources for Students Act. 6    Section 5. Library database resources; safety policies and 7technology protection measures. 8    (a) A school district, State agency, public library, or 9public university or community college may offer digital or 10online library database resources to students in grades 11kindergarten through 12 only if the provider of the resources 12verifies that all the resources comply with subsection (b).13    (b) Digital or online library database resources offered 14by a school district, State agency, public library, or public 15university or community college to students in grades 16kindergarten through 12 shall have safety policies and 17technology protection measures that:18        (1) prohibit and prevent a user of the resources from 19    sending, receiving, viewing, or downloading child 20    pornography, obscene materials, or materials that depict 21    child sexual exploitation under Sections 11-20, 11-20.1, 22    and 11-9.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012; and23        (2) filter or block access to child pornography,   HB2817- 2 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1    obscene materials, or materials that depict child sexual 2    exploitation under Sections 11-20, 11-20.1, and 11-9.1 of 3    the Criminal Code of 2012. 4    Section 10. Noncompliance. 5    (a) Notwithstanding any contract provision to the 6contrary, if a provider of digital or online library resources 7fails to comply with Section 5, the school district, State 8agency, public library, or public university or community 9college shall withhold further payments, if any, to the 10provider pending verification of compliance.11    (b) If a provider of digital or online library database 12resources fails to timely verify that the provider is in 13compliance with subsection (b) of Section 5, then the school 14district, State agency, public library, or public university 15or community college shall consider the provider's act of 16noncompliance as a breach of contract. 17    (c) No later than December 1 of each year, each school 18district, State agency, public library, public university, and 19public community college shall submit to the General Assembly 20an aggregate written report on any issues related to provider 21noncompliance under this Section. 22    Section 15. Willful violation of criminal law. Nothing in 23this Act exempts from prosecution an employee of a school 24district, State agency, public library, or public university   HB2817- 3 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1or community college for a willful violation of Section 11-20 2or 11-20.1 of the Criminal Code of 2012. 3    Section 90. The School Code is amended by changing Section 427A-5 as follows: 5    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)6    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)7    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 8    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 9nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 10school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 11corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 12authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.13    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 14by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 15school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 16new applications to establish a charter school in a city 17having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 18charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 19does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 20before April 16, 2003.21    (b-5) (Blank). 22    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 23its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 24provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter   HB2817- 4 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 2the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 3or other governing body must include at least one parent or 4guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 5who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 6network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 7directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 8Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 9    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 10year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 11school's board of directors or other governing body shall 12complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 13leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 14familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 15responsibilities, including financial oversight and 16accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 17school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 18Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 19and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 20voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 21other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 22professional development training in these same areas. The 23training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 24a statewide charter school membership association or may be 25provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 26the State Board.   HB2817- 5 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 2health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 3requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 4preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 5students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 6prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 7school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 8requirement" does not include any course of study or 9specialized instructional requirement for which the State 10Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 11designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 12to master and apply as an outcome of their education.13    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 14health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 15under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 16promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 17non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 18school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 19than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 20school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 21requires the charter school to follow the list of all 22non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 23the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 24requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 25term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 26an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety   HB2817- 6 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1requirements in a charter school contract that are not 2contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 3including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 4authorizing local school board. 5    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 6charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 7charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 8instructional materials, and student activities.9    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 10management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 11not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 12charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 13outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 14school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 15school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 16in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 17To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 18funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 19charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 20Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 21charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 22Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 23financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 24require quarterly financial statements from each charter 25school. 26    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of   HB2817- 7 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 2all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 3schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 4of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 5exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 6governing public schools and local school board policies; 7however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:8        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 9    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 10    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 11    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 12    for employment;13        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 14    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;15        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 16    Tort Immunity Act;17        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 18    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 19    officers, directors, employees, and agents;20        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;21        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 22    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;23        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;24        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 25    report cards;26        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;  HB2817- 8 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 2    prevention;3        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 4    discipline reporting;5        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;6        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;7        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;8        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;9        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 10        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;11        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;12        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;13        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;14        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;15        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;16        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 17        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code;18        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;19        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 20        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 21    10-20.56 of this Code; 22        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 23        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 24        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 25        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;26        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code;   HB2817- 9 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 2        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 3        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;4        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and5        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code. 6    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 7(g) is declaratory of existing law.8    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 9school district, the governing body of a State college or 10university or public community college, or any other public or 11for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 12school building and grounds or any other real property or 13facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 14for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 15maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 16activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 17to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 18Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 19district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 20use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 21services for which a charter school contracts with a school 22district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 23services for which a charter school contracts with a local 24school board or with the governing body of a State college or 25university or public community college shall be provided by 26the public entity at cost.  HB2817- 10 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 2by converting an existing school or attendance center to 3charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 4deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 5agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 6costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 7facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 8subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 9local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.10    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 11or grade level.12    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 13Board, then the charter school is its own local education 14agency. 15(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 16102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-522, eff. 178-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 18102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-805, eff. 191-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, 20eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 21103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-9-24.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)23    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 24    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 25nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter   HB2817- 11 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 2corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 3authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.4    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 5by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 6school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 7new applications to establish a charter school in a city 8having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 9charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 10does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 11before April 16, 2003.12    (b-5) (Blank). 13    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 14its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 15provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 16school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 17the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 18or other governing body must include at least one parent or 19guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 20who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 21network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 22directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 23Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 24    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 25year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 26school's board of directors or other governing body shall   HB2817- 12 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 2leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 3familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 4responsibilities, including financial oversight and 5accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 6school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 7Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 8and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 9voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 10other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 11professional development training in these same areas. The 12training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 13a statewide charter school membership association or may be 14provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 15the State Board. 16    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 17health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 18requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 19preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 20students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 21prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 22school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 23requirement" does not include any course of study or 24specialized instructional requirement for which the State 25Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 26designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students   HB2817- 13 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1to master and apply as an outcome of their education.2    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 3health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 4under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 5promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 6non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 7school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 8than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 9school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 10requires the charter school to follow the list of all 11non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 12the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 13requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 14term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 15an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 16requirements in a charter school contract that are not 17contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 18including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 19authorizing local school board. 20    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 21charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 22charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 23instructional materials, and student activities.24    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 25management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 26not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each   HB2817- 14 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 2outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 3school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 4school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 5in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 6To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 7funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 8charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 9Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 10charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 11Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 12financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 13require quarterly financial statements from each charter 14school. 15    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 16this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 17all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 18schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 19of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 20exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 21governing public schools and local school board policies; 22however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:23        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 24    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 25    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 26    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants   HB2817- 15 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1    for employment;2        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 3    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;4        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 5    Tort Immunity Act;6        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 7    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 8    officers, directors, employees, and agents;9        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;10        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 11    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;12        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;13        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 14    report cards;15        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;16        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 17    prevention;18        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 19    discipline reporting;20        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;21        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;22        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;23        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;24        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 25        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;26        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;  HB2817- 16 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;2        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;3        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;4        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;5        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 6        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 7        (24) Article 26A of this Code;8        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;9        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 10        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 11    10-20.56 of this Code; 12        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 13        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 14        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 15        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;16        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 17        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 18        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 19        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;20        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and21        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code.22        (38) the Database Resources for Students Act. 23    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 24(g) is declaratory of existing law.25    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 26school district, the governing body of a State college or   HB2817- 17 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1university or public community college, or any other public or 2for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 3school building and grounds or any other real property or 4facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 5for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 6maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 7activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 8to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 9Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 10district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 11use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 12services for which a charter school contracts with a school 13district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 14services for which a charter school contracts with a local 15school board or with the governing body of a State college or 16university or public community college shall be provided by 17the public entity at cost.18    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 19by converting an existing school or attendance center to 20charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 21deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 22agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 23costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 24facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 25subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 26local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.  HB2817- 18 -LRB104 06555 LNS 16591 b1    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 2or grade level.3    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 4Board, then the charter school is its own local education 5agency. 6(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 7102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-466, eff. 87-1-25; 102-522, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, 9eff. 12-3-21; 102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 10102-805, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, 12eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 15changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 16that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 17represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 18not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 19made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 20Public Act. 21    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 222026.